District of Columbia statutes.
3-203

Receipt of bodies; distribution; notice.

The said Anatomical Board may receive the bodies reported to it as aforesaid, and may distribute and deliver such as are received among and to such of the schools and boards entitled thereto as request in writing to receive the same, except as otherwise expressly directed in this chapter. Each such school and board shall receive annually, as nearly as may be practicable, such proportion of the entire number of bodies distributed as the number of students enrolled and in regular attendance at such school, and the number of candidates appearing for examination before such board, respectively, engaged bona fide at such school, or examined by said board in dissecting, and operative surgery on the cadaver, bears to the total number of students so enrolled in attendance, and engaged, and of persons so examined, in the District of Columbia. The secretary, dean, or other proper officer of each such school and board shall report to said Anatomical Board the names of all such students in attendance at such school or persons examined by said board, as the case may be, at such times and in such form as said Board may direct. All bodies shall be delivered among such schools and boards in regular order so as to maintain, as nearly as may be practicable, an equitable allotment at all times; and bodies assigned to any school or board in regular order and refused by such school or board without sufficient cause shall be charged against the quota of such school or board in such manner as not to prejudice any other school or board. But no body shall be delivered to any school or board unless within not less than 24 hours prior to such delivery notice of the death has been given by said Anatomical Board to the nearest known kinsman, relative by marriage, or friend of the deceased, or if none such be known, published by said Anatomical Board at least once in a daily newspaper published in the City of Washington, District of Columbia. The notice required by this section shall be deemed to have been given if served in writing on the person to be notified, or if left at his usual place of residence with some adult person residing therein, or a member of the family of such person. Said Board shall take receipts by name, or, if the name be unknown, by a description, for each body delivered; all receipts so obtained by said Board shall be properly filed by it.

Apr. 29, 1902, 32 Stat. 174, ch. 638, § 3
Movement or disposal of tissue taken from dead bodies, see § 43-119
1981 Ed., § 2-1403.
1973 Ed., § 2-203.
Anatomical Board abolished: See note to § 3-201.